Utah statutes.
62A-4a-408.   Written reports.

(1)  Reports made pursuant to this part shall be followed by a written report within 48 hours, if requested by the division.  The division shall immediately forward a copy of that report to the statewide central register, on forms supplied by the register.

(2)  If, in connection with an intended or completed abortion by a minor, a physician is required to make a report of incest or abuse of a minor, the report may not include information that would in any way disclose that the report was made in connection with:

(a)  an abortion; or

(b)  a consultation regarding an abortion.

